Alabama, session 2026rs, SB190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the period commencing on October 1,
2026, and ending on September 30, 2031, unless extended by an
act of the Legislature, Precision Ocular is exempt from paying
any state sales and use taxes.
(b) Precision Ocular may be exempted from paying county
and municipal sales and use taxes upon approval of the county
or municipality pursuant to Section 40-23-4.01, Code of
Alabama 1975.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
SB190 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB190
Senate 17-Feb-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate, as amended.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 07-Apr-26




By: Senator Waggoner
Page 2